Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PUBLIC WATERS INVENTORY MODIFICATIONS MORATORIUM; REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of natural resources may not modify the public waters inventory under Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.201, until July 1, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with counties, cities, townships, watershed districts, soil and water conservation districts, and other interested parties, must submit a report to the legislature on the public waters inventory modification process, including any necessary legislative changes, to ensure all modifications to the public waters inventory provide an opportunity for local government involvement and public comment. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end